fr: Options d’alimentation/de charge intégrées: Aucune; Prises électriques et ports USB; Prises électriques seulement; Ports USB seulement; Autre
es: Opciones integradas de alimentación/carga: Ninguno; Tomas de corriente y puertos USB; Solo tomas de corriente; Solo puertos USB; Otros
cs: Integrované možnosti napájení/nabíjení: Žádný; Elektrické zásuvky a USB porty; Pouze elektrické zásuvky; Pouze USB porty; Jiné
nl: Geïntegreerde stroom-/oplaadopties: Geen; Stopcontacten en USB-poorten; Alleen stopcontacten; Alleen USB-poorten; Andere
zh-CN: 集成电源/充电选项: 无; 电源插座和 USB 端口; 仅电源插座; 仅 USB 端口; 其他
pt-BR: Opções integradas de energia/carregamento: Nenhum; Tomadas e portas USB; Apenas tomadas; Apenas portas USB; Outro
fi: Integroidut virta-/latausvaihtoehdot: Ei mitään; Pistorasiat ja USB-portit; Vain pistorasiat; Vain USB-portit; Muu
hr-HR: Integrirane opcije napajanja/punjenja: Nema; Strujne utičnice i USB portovi; Samo strujne utičnice; Samo USB portovi; Ostalo
pt-PT: Opções integradas de energia/carregamento: Nenhum; Tomadas elétricas e portas USB; Apenas tomadas elétricas; Apenas portas USB; Outro
el: Ενσωματωμένες επιλογές τροφοδοσίας/φόρτισης: Καμία; Πρίζες και θύρες USB; Μόνο πρίζες; Μόνο θύρες USB; Άλλο
sk-SK: Integrované možnosti napájania/nabíjania: Žiadny; Elektrické zásuvky a USB porty; Iba elektrické zásuvky; Iba USB porty; Iné
ja: 統合電源／充電オプション: なし; 電源コンセントとUSBポート; 電源コンセントのみ; USBポートのみ; その他
nb: Integrerte strøm-/ladealternativer: Ingen; Strømuttak og USB-porter; Kun strømuttak; Kun USB-porter; Annet
ko: 통합 전원/충전 옵션: 없음; 전원 콘센트 및 USB 포트; 전원 콘센트만; USB 포트만; 기타
ro-RO: Opțiuni integrate de alimentare/încărcare: Niciuna; Prize de curent și porturi USB; Doar prize de curent; Doar porturi USB; Altele
zh-TW: 整合電源/充電選項: 無; 電源插座和 USB 埠; 僅電源插座; 僅 USB 埠; 其他
sv: Integrerade ström-/laddningsalternativ: Inga; Eluttag och USB-portar; Endast eluttag; Endast USB-portar; Övrigt
en: Integrated power/charging options: None; Power outlets and USB ports; Power outlets only; USB ports only; Other
th: ตัวเลือกพลังงาน/การชาร์จในตัว: ไม่มี; เต้าเสียบและพอร์ต USB; เต้าเสียบเท่านั้น; พอร์ต USB เท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Интегрирани опции за захранване/зареждане: Няма; Контакти и USB портове; Само контакти; Само USB портове; Други
it: Opzioni integrate di alimentazione/ricarica: Nessuna; Prese di corrente e porte USB; Solo prese di corrente; Solo porte USB; Altro
de: Integrierte Stromversorgungs‑ und Ladeoptionen: Keine; Steckdosen und USB-Anschlüsse; Nur Steckdosen; Nur USB-Anschlüsse; Sonstiges
hu: Integrált tápellátás/töltési lehetőségek: Egyik sem; Hálózati aljzatok és USB portok; Csak hálózati aljzatok; Csak USB portok; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vgrajene možnosti napajanja/polnjenja: Brez; Električne vtičnice in USB vrata; Samo električne vtičnice; Samo USB vrata; Drugo
lt-LT: Integruotos maitinimo/įkrovimo parinktys: Nėra; Elektros lizdai ir USB prievadai; Tik elektros lizdai; Tik USB prievadai; Kita
da: Integrerede strøm-/opladningsmuligheder: Ingen; Stikkontakter og USB-porte; Kun stikkontakter; Kun USB-porte; Andet
vi: Tùy chọn nguồn/sạc tích hợp: Không có; Ổ cắm điện và cổng USB; Chỉ ổ cắm điện; Chỉ cổng USB; Khác
ru: Встроенные варианты питания и зарядки: Нет; Розетки и USB-порты; Только розетки; Только USB-порты; Другой
tr: Entegre güç/şarj seçenekleri: Hiçbiri; Güç prizleri ve USB portları; Sadece güç prizleri; Sadece USB portları; Diğer
pl: Zintegrowane opcje zasilania/ładowania: Brak; Gniazdka elektryczne i porty USB; Tylko gniazdka elektryczne; Tylko porty USB; Inne